Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.210

Breakfast after the bell program. (Expires June 30, 2028.)

(1)(a) In accordance with RCW 28A.235.230 and except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, beginning in the 2019-20 school year, each high-needs school shall offer breakfast after the bell to each student and provide adequate time for students to consume the offered food.

(b) Public schools that are not obligated by this section to offer breakfast after the bell are encouraged to do so. Nothing in this section is intended to prevent a high-needs school from implementing a breakfast after the bell program before the 2019-20 school year.

(2) High-needs schools with at least seventy percent of free or reduced-price eligible children participating in both school lunch and school breakfast are exempt from the provisions of subsection (1) of this section. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall evaluate individual participation rates annually, and make the participation rates publicly available.

(3) Each high-needs school may determine the breakfast after the bell service model that best suits its students. Service models include, but are not limited to, breakfast in the classroom, grab and go breakfast, and second chance breakfast.

(4) All breakfasts served in a breakfast after the bell program must comply with federal meal patterns and nutrition standards for school breakfast programs under the federal healthy, hunger-free kids act of 2010, (P.L. 111-296) and any federal regulations implementing that act. By December 1, 2018, and as needed thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must develop and distribute best practices and provide technical assistance to school districts on strategies for selecting food items that are low in added sugar. When choosing foods to serve in a breakfast after the bell program, schools must give preference to foods that are healthful and fresh, and if feasible, give preference to Washington-grown food.

(5) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the superintendent of public instruction shall administer one-time start-up allocation grants to each high-needs school implementing a breakfast after the bell program under this section. Grant funds provided under this section must be used for the costs associated with launching a breakfast after the bell program, including but not limited to equipment purchases, training, additional staff costs, and janitorial services.

(6) The legislature does not intend to include the breakfast after the bell programs under this section, including the provision of breakfast, within the definition or funding of the program of basic education under Article IX of the state Constitution.

[ 2018 c 8 s 3.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2018 c 8 ss 3, 4, and 6: "Sections 3, 4, and 6 of this act expire June 30, 2028." [ 2018 c 8 s 10.]

Findings—Intent—2018 c 8: "(1) The legislature finds that thoughtful and evidence-based school food programs are associated with improved outcomes for students, including reductions in tardiness, absenteeism, suspensions, and reported illnesses and visits to nurses' offices. The legislature further finds that thoughtful and evidence-based school food programs are also associated with improved student results on standardized tests and improved graduation rates.

(2) The legislature acknowledges that existing school-related farm programs play an important role in helping students to better understand the relationships between academics, food, farming, and good health.

(3) The legislature finds that the purpose of sections 1 through 7 of this act is to achieve the public policy benefits specified in subsection (1) of this section: Improved student outcomes. To do so, the legislature intends to:

(a) Expand opportunities for students to have a healthy breakfast by requiring schools with large populations of qualifying low-income students to offer breakfast after the bell programs, a program model that has increased breakfast participation rates in other states; and

(b) Increase support for school-related farm programs that have proven successful in supporting students through policies that, among other benefits, promote student health and readiness through healthy local foods and school garden projects; and

(c) Conduct an analysis of breakfast after the bell programs established in accordance with section 3 of this act." [ 2018 c 8 s 1.]

Short title—2018 c 8: "This act may be known and cited as the Washington kids ready to learn act of 2018." [ 2018 c 8 s 11.]